Utah statutes.
78B-12-301.   Base combined child support obligation table -- Both parents.

The table in this section shall be used to:

(1)  establish a child support order entered for the first time on or after January 1, 2008;

(2)  modify a child support order entered for the first time on or after January 1, 2008; 

(3)  modify a temporary judicial child support order established on or before December 31, 2007, if the new order is entered on or after January 1, 2008; or

(4)  modify a final child support order entered on or before December 31, 2007, if the modification is made on or after January 1, 2010.

 

Monthly Combined Adj. Gross Income



Number of Children

 



1

2

3

4

5

6

 

From

To













 

726 -

750

138

 245

286

 319

351

382

 

751 -

775

141

 252

294

 328

360

392

 

776 -

800

146

 259

301

 336

370

402

 

801 -

825

151

 265

309

 345

379

412

 

826 -

850

155

 272

317

 353

389

423

 

851 -

875

160

 279

324

 362

398

433

 

876 -

900

165

 285

332

 370

407

443

 

901 -

925

169

 292

340

 379

417

453

 

926 -

950

174

 299

348

 387

426

464

 

951 -

975

179

 305

355

 396

436

474

 

976 -

1,000

183

 312

363

 405

445

484

 

1,001 -

1,050

193

 322

374

 417

459

500

 

1,051 -

1,100

201

 335

390

 435

478

520

 

1,101 -

1,150

210

 348

405

 452

497

541

 

1,151 -

1,200

220

 362

420

 469

516

561

 

1,201 -

1,250

229

 375

436

 486

535

582

 

1,251 -

1,300

238

 388

451

 503

553

602

 

1,301 -

1,350

248

 401

467

 520

572

623

 

1,351 -

1,400

256

 414

481

 536

590

642

 

1,401 -

1,450

265

 426

495

 552

607

661

 

1,451 -

1,500

275

 438

510

 568

625

680

 

1,501 -

1,550

284

 451

524

 584

643

699

 

1,551 -

1,600

293

 463

538

 600

660

718

 

1,601 -

1,650

303

 476

553

 616

678

737

 

1,651 -

1,700

311

 488

567

 632

695

757

 

1,701 -

1,750

320

 500

581

 648

713

776

 

1,751 -

1,800

330

 513

596

 664

731

795

 

1,801 -

1,850

339

 525

610

 680

748

814

 

1,851 -

1,900

348

 538

624

 696

766

833

 

1,901 -

1,950

358

 550

638

 712

783

852

 

1,951 -

2,000

366

 562

652

 727

800

870

 

2,001 -

2,100

385

 580

673

 750

825

898

 

2,101 -

2,200

399

 604

701

 781

859

935

 

2,201 -

2,300

410

 628

728

 812

893

972

 

2,301 -

2,400

420

 652

756

 843

927

1,009

 

2,401 -

2,500

431

 676

784

 874

961

1,046

 

2,501 -

2,600

443

 700

811

 904

995

1,082

 

2,601 -

2,700

453

 723

838

 934

1,028

1,118

 

2,701 -

2,800

464

 747

865

 964

1,060

1,154

 

2,801 -

2,900

475

 770

891

 994

1,093

1,189

 

2,901 -

3,000

485

 794

918

1,024

1,126

1,225

 

3,001 -

3,100

496

 817

945

1,054

1,159

1,261

 

3,101 -

3,200

508

 838

970

1,081

1,189

1,294

 

3,201 -

3,300

518

 859

994

1,108

1,219

1,326

 

3,301 -

3,400

529

 881

 1,018

1,135

1,248

1,358

 

3,401 -

3,500

539

 902

 1,042

1,162

1,278

1,391

 

3,501 -

3,600

548

 923

 1,066

1,189

1,308

1,423

 

3,601 -

3,700

555

 944

 1,090

1,216

1,337

1,455

 

3,701 -

3,800

564

 965

 1,115

1,243

1,367

1,487

 

3,801 -

3,900

573

 985

 1,138

1,269

1,396

1,519

 

3,901 -

4,000

581

1,004

 1,160

1,294

1,423

1,548

 

4,001 -

4,100

590

1,024

 1,182

1,318

1,450

1,577

 

4,101 -

4,200

599

1,043

 1,204

1,342

1,477

1,607

 

4,201 -

4,300

608

1,062

 1,226

1,367

1,503

1,636

 

4,301 -

4,400

616

1,081

 1,248

1,391

1,530

1,665

 

4,401 -

4,500

624

1,101

 1,270

1,416

1,557

1,694

 

4,501 -

4,600

633

1,119

 1,291

1,439

1,583

1,722

 

4,601 -

4,700

641

1,133

 1,306

1,456

1,601

1,742

 

4,701 -

4,800

650

1,147

 1,321

1,473

1,620

1,762

 

4,801 -

4,900

659

1,161

 1,336

1,489

1,638

1,783

 

4,901 -

5,000

668

1,175

 1,351

1,506

1,657

1,803

 

5,001 -

5,100

676

1,189

 1,366

1,523

1,675

1,823

 

5,101 -

5,200

684

1,203

 1,381

1,540

1,694

1,843

 

5,201 -

5,300

693

1,217

 1,396

1,557

1,712

1,863

 

5,301 -

5,400

701

1,227

 1,408

1,570

1,726

1,878

 

5,401 -

5,500

710

1,238

 1,419

1,582

1,741

1,894

 

5,501 -

5,600

719

1,248

 1,431

1,595

1,755

1,909

 

5,601 -

5,700

728

1,259

 1,442

1,608

1,769

1,925

 

5,701 -

5,800

733

1,269

 1,454

1,621

1,783

1,940

 

5,801 -

5,900

739

1,280

 1,465

1,634

1,797

1,956

 

5,901 -

6,000

745

1,290

 1,477

1,647

1,812

1,971

 

6,001 -

6,100

751

1,302

 1,490

1,661

1,827

1,988

 

6,101 -

6,200

756

1,313

 1,503

1,676

1,843

2,005

 

6,201 -

6,300

763

1,325

 1,516

1,690

1,859

2,023

 

6,301 -

6,400

769

1,336

 1,528

1,704

1,874

2,039

 

6,401 -

6,500

775

1,347

 1,540

1,717

1,889

2,055

 

6,501 -

6,600

780

1,358

 1,553

1,731

1,904

2,072

 

6,601 -

6,700

786

1,369

 1,565

1,745

1,919

2,088

 

6,701 -

6,800

786

1,380

 1,577

1,759

1,934

2,105

 

6,801 -

6,900

841

1,391

 1,590

1,772

1,950

2,121

 

6,901 -

7,000

850

1,402

 1,602

1,786

1,965

2,138

 

7,001 -

7,100

859

1,413

 1,614

1,800

1,980

2,154

 

7,101 -

7,200

868

1,417

 1,618

1,804

1,985

2,159

 

7,201 -

7,300

876

1,420

 1,621

1,807

1,988

2,163

 

7,301 -

7,400

883

1,423

 1,624

1,811

1,992

2,167

 

7,401 -

7,500

888

1,426

 1,627

1,814

1,996

2,171

 

7,501 -

7,600

894

1,429

 1,630

1,818

1,999

2,175

 

7,601 -

7,700

899

1,432

 1,633

1,821

2,003

2,179

 

7,701 -

7,800

904

1,436

 1,636

1,824

2,007

2,184

 

7,801 -

7,900

910

1,439

 1,639

1,828

2,011

2,188

 

7,901 -

8,000

915

1,442

 1,642

1,831

2,014

2,192

 

8,001 -

8,100

921

1,445

 1,646

1,835

2,018

2,196

 

8,101 -

8,200

926

1,448

 1,649

1,838

2,022

2,200

 

8,201 -

8,300

933

1,451

 1,652

1,842

2,026

2,204

 

8,301 -

8,400

938

1,454

 1,655

1,845

2,029

2,208

 

8,401 -

8,500

944

1,460

 1,661

1,852

2,037

2,216

 

8,501 -

8,600

949

1,475

 1,678

1,871

2,058

2,240

 

8,601 -

8,700

954

1,491

 1,696

1,891

2,080

2,263

 

8,701 -

8,800

960

1,506

 1,714

1,911

2,102

2,287

 

8,801 -

8,900

965

1,522

 1,732

1,931

2,124

2,311

 

8,901 -

9,000

971

1,537

 1,749

1,951

2,146

2,334

 

9,001 -

9,100

976

1,553

 1,767

1,970

2,167

2,358

 

9,101 -

9,200

983

1,568

 1,785

1,990

2,189

2,382

 

9,201 -

9,300

988

1,584

 1,803

2,010

2,211

2,405

 

9,301 -

9,400

994

1,599

 1,820

2,030

2,233

2,429

 

9,401 -

9,500

999

1,614

 1,838

2,049

2,254

2,453

 

9,501 -

9,600

1,004

1,630

 1,856

2,069

2,276

2,477

 

9,601 -

9,700

1,010

1,645

 1,874

2,089

2,298

2,500

 

9,701 -

9,800

1,015

1,661

 1,891

2,109

2,320

2,524

 

9,801 -

9,900

1,021

1,673

 1,905

2,124

2,336

2,542

 

9,901 -

 10,000

1,026

1,683

 1,917

2,137

2,351

2,557

 

10,001 -

 10,100

1,033

1,694

 1,928

2,150

2,365

2,573

 

10,101 -

 10,200

1,039

1,704

 1,940

2,163

2,379

2,589

 

10,201 -

 10,300

1,045

1,715

 1,951

2,176

2,394

2,604

 

10,301 -

 10,400

1,051

1,725

 1,963

2,189

2,408

2,620

 

10,401 -

 10,500

1,058

1,736

 1,975

2,202

2,422

2,635

 

10,501 -

 10,600

1,064

1,746

 1,986

2,215

2,436

2,651

 

10,601 -

 10,700

1,070

1,757

 1,998

2,228

2,451

2,666

 

10,701 -

 10,800

1,077

1,767

 2,010

2,241

2,465

2,682

 

10,801 -

 10,900

1,083

1,778

 2,021

2,254

2,479

2,697

 

10,901 -

 11,000

1,090

1,788

 2,033

2,267

2,494

2,713

 

11,001 -

 11,100

1,096

1,799

 2,045

2,280

2,508

2,729

 

11,101 -

 11,200

1,103

1,809

 2,056

2,293

2,522

2,744

 

11,201 -

 11,300

1,109

1,820

 2,068

2,306

2,537

2,760

 

11,301 -

 11,400

1,116

1,830

 2,080

2,319

2,551

2,775

 

11,401 -

 11,500

1,123

1,841

 2,091

2,332

2,565

2,791

 

11,501 -

 11,600

1,129

1,851

 2,103

2,345

2,579

2,806

 

11,601 -

 11,700

1,136

1,862

 2,115

2,358

2,594

2,822

 

11,701 -

 11,800

1,143

1,872

 2,126

2,371

2,608

2,838

 

11,801 -

 11,900

1,150

1,882

 2,138

2,383

2,622

2,852

 

11,901 -

 12,000

1,157

1,892

 2,148

2,395

2,635

2,867

 

12,001 -

 12,100

1,164

1,901

 2,159

2,407

2,648

2,881

 

12,101 -

 12,200

1,171

1,910

 2,170

2,419

2,661

2,895

 

12,201 -

 12,300

1,178

1,919

 2,180

2,431

2,674

2,910

 

12,301 -

 12,400

1,185

1,929

 2,191

2,443

2,687

2,924

 

12,401 -

 12,500

1,192

1,938

 2,202

2,455

2,700

2,938

 

12,501 -

 12,600

1,199

1,947

 2,212

2,467

2,714

2,952

 

12,601 -

 12,700

1,206

1,956

 2,223

2,479

2,727

2,967

 

12,701 -

 12,800

1,213

1,966

 2,234

2,491

2,740

2,981

 

12,801 -

 12,900

1,220

1,975

 2,245

2,503

2,753

2,995

 

12,901 -

 13,000

1,227

1,984

 2,255

2,514

2,766

3,009

 

13,001 -

 13,100

1,233

1,993

 2,265

2,525

2,778

3,022

 

13,101 -

 13,200

1,239

2,001

 2,275

2,536

2,790

3,035

 

13,201 -

 13,300

1,245

2,010

 2,285

2,547

2,802

3,049

 

13,301 -

 13,400

1,250

2,018

 2,294

2,558

2,814

3,062

 

13,401 -

 13,500

1,256

2,027

 2,304

2,569

2,826

3,075

 

13,501 -

 13,600

1,262

2,035

 2,314

2,580

2,838

3,088

 

13,601 -

 13,700

1,267

2,044

 2,324

2,591

2,850

3,101

 

13,701 -

 13,800

1,273

2,052

 2,334

2,602

2,862

3,114

 

13,801 -

 13,900

1,279

2,061

 2,344

2,613

2,875

3,127

 

13,901 -

 14,000

1,284

2,069

 2,354

2,624

2,887

3,141

 

14,001 -

 14,100

1,290

2,078

 2,363

2,635

2,899

3,154

 

14,101 -

 14,200

1,296

2,087

 2,373

2,646

2,911

3,167

 

14,201 -

 14,300

1,301

2,095

 2,383

2,657

2,923

3,180

 

14,301 -

 14,400

1,306

2,104

 2,393

2,668

2,935

3,193

 

14,401 -

 14,500

1,312

2,112

 2,403

2,679

2,947

3,206

 

14,501 -

 14,600

1,317

2,121

 2,413

2,690

2,959

3,220

 

14,601 -

 14,700

1,323

2,129

 2,423

2,701

2,971

3,233

 

14,701 -

 14,800

1,329

2,138

 2,432

2,712

2,983

3,246

 

14,801 -

 14,900

1,334

2,146

 2,442

2,723

2,995

3,259

 

14,901 -

 15,000

1,340

2,155

 2,452

2,734

3,008

3,272

 

15,001 -

 15,100

1,345

2,163

 2,461

2,744

3,018

3,284

 

15,101 -

 15,200

1,351

2,170

 2,469

2,752

3,028

3,294

 

15,201 -

 15,300

1,357

2,177

 2,476

2,761

3,037

3,304

 

15,301 -

 15,400

1,362

2,184

 2,484

2,769

3,046

3,314

 

15,401 -

 15,500

1,368

2,191

 2,491

2,778

3,056

3,325

 

15,501 -

 15,600

1,373

2,198

 2,499

2,786

3,065

3,335

 

15,601 -

 15,700

1,379

2,205

 2,507

2,795

3,074

3,345

 

15,701 -

 15,800

1,384

2,211

 2,514

2,803

3,084

3,355

 

15,801 -

 15,900

1,390

2,218

 2,522

2,812

3,093

3,365

 

15,901 -

 16,000

1,395

2,225

 2,529

2,820

3,102

3,375

 

16,001 -

 16,100

1,401

2,232

 2,537

2,829

3,112

3,385

 

16,101 -

 16,200

1,407

2,239

 2,545

2,837

3,121

3,396

 

16,201 -

 16,300

1,412

2,246

 2,552

2,846

3,130

3,406

 

16,301 -

 16,400

1,418

2,253

 2,560

2,854

3,140

3,416

 

16,401 -

 16,500

1,423

2,260

 2,567

2,863

3,149

3,426

 

16,501 -

 16,600

1,429

2,267

 2,575

2,871

3,158

3,436

 

16,601 -

 16,700

1,434

2,274

 2,583

2,880

3,168

3,446

 

16,701 -

 16,800

1,440

2,281

 2,590

2,888

3,177

3,457

 

16,801 -

 16,900

1,445

2,288

 2,598

2,897

3,186

3,467

 

16,901 -

 17,000

1,451

2,295

 2,605

2,905

3,196

3,477

 

17,001 -

 17,100

1,456

2,302

 2,613

2,914

3,205

3,487

 

17,101 -

 17,200

1,462

2,309

 2,621

2,922

3,214

3,497

 

17,201 -

 17,300

1,467

2,316

 2,628

2,931

3,224

3,507

 

17,301 -

 17,400

1,473

2,323

 2,636

2,939

3,233

3,517

 

17,401 -

 17,500

1,478

2,330

 2,643

2,947

3,242

3,528

 

17,501 -

 17,600

1,483

2,337

 2,651

2,956

3,252

3,538

 

17,601 -

 17,700

1,489

2,344

 2,659

2,964

3,261

3,548

 

17,701 -

 17,800

1,494

2,351

 2,666

2,973

3,270

3,558

 

17,801 -

 17,900

1,499

2,358

 2,674

2,981

3,280

3,568

 

17,901 -

 18,000

1,505

2,365

 2,682

2,990

3,289

3,578

 

18,001 -

 18,100

1,510

2,372

 2,689

2,998

3,298

3,588

 

18,101 -

 18,200

1,516

2,379

 2,697

3,007

3,308

3,599

 

18,201 -

 18,300

1,520

2,386

 2,704

3,015

3,317

3,609

 

18,301 -

 18,400

1,525

2,392

 2,712

3,024

3,326

3,619

 

18,401 -

 18,500

1,530

2,399

 2,720

3,032

3,336

3,629

 

18,501 -

 18,600

1,535

2,406

 2,727

3,041

3,345

3,639

 

18,601 -

 18,700

1,540

2,413

 2,735

3,049

3,354

3,649

 

18,701 -

 18,800

1,545

2,420

 2,742

3,058

3,364

3,659

 

18,801 -

 18,900

1,550

2,427

 2,750

3,066

3,373

3,670

 

18,901 -

 19,000

1,555

2,434

 2,758

3,075

3,382

3,680

 

19,001 -

 19,100

1,560

2,441

 2,765

3,083

3,391

3,690

 

19,101 -

 19,200

1,565

2,448

 2,773

3,092

3,401

3,700

 

19,201 -

 19,300

1,570

2,455

 2,780

3,100

3,410

3,710

 

19,301 -

 19,400

1,575

2,462

 2,788

3,109

3,419

3,720

 

19,401 -

 19,500

1,580

2,469

 2,796

3,117

3,429

3,731

 

19,501 -

 19,600

1,585

2,476

 2,803

3,126

3,438

3,741

 

19,601 -

 19,700

1,590

2,483

 2,811

3,134

3,447

3,751

 

19,701 -

 19,800

1,595

2,490

 2,818

3,143

3,457

3,761

 

19,801 -

 19,900

1,600

2,497

 2,826

3,151

3,466

3,771

 

19,901 -

 20,000

1,605

2,504

 2,834

3,159

3,475

3,781

 

20,001 -

 22,000

 1,766

2,754

 3,117

3,475

3,822

4,159

 

22,001 -

 24,000

 1,926

3,005

 3,401

3,791

4,170

4,537

 

24,001 -

 26,000

 2,087

3,255

 3,684

4,107

4,518

4,915

 

26,001 -

 28,000

 2,247

3,506

 3,968

4,423

4,865

5,293

 

28,001 -

 30,000

 2,408

3,756

 4,251

4,739

5,213

5,672

 

30,001 -

 32,000

 2,508

3,916

 4,451

4,979

5,473

5,952

 

32,001 -

 34,000

 2,608

4,076

 4,651

5,219

5,733

6,232

 

34,001 -

 36,000

 2,708

4,236

 4,851

5,459

5,993

6,512

 

36,001 -

 38,000

 2,808

4,396

 5,051

5,699

6,253

6,792

 

38,001 -

 40,000

 2,908

4,556

 5,251

5,939

6,513

7,072

 

40,001 -

 42,000

 3,008

4,716

 5,451

6,179

6,773

7,352

 

42,001 -

 44,000

 3,108

4,876

 5,651

6,419

7,033

7,632

 

44,001 -

 46,000

 3,208

5,036

 5,851

6,659

7,293

7,912

 

46,001 -

 48,000

 3,308

5,196

 6,051

6,899

7,553

8,192

 

48,001 -

 50,000

 3,408

5,356

 6,251

7,139

7,813

8,472

 

50,001 -

 52,000

 3,508

5,476

 6,391

7,299

7,993

8,672

 

52,001 -

 54,000

 3,608

5,596

 6,531

7,459

8,173

8,872

 

54,001 -

 56,000

 3,708

5,716

 6,671

7,619

8,353

9,072

 

56,001 -

 58,000

 3,808

5,836

 6,811

7,779

8,533

9,272

 

58,001 -

 60,000

 3,908

5,956

 6,951

7,939

8,713

9,472

 

60,001 -

 62,000

 4,008

6,076

 7,091

8,099

8,893

9,672

 

62,001 -

 64,000

 4,108

6,196

 7,231

8,259

9,073

9,872

 

64,001 -

 66,000

 4,208

6,316

 7,371

8,419

9,253

10,072

 

66,001 -

 68,000

 4,308

6,436

 7,511

8,579

9,433

10,272

 

68,001 -

 70,000

 4,408

6,556

 7,651

8,739

9,613

10,472

 

70,001 -

 72,000

 4,508

6,676

 7,791

8,899

9,793

10,672

 

72,001 -

 74,000

 4,608

6,796

 7,931

9,059

9,973

10,872

 

74,001 -

 76,000

 4,708

6,916

 8,071

9,219

 10,153

11,072

 

76,001 -

 78,000

 4,808

7,036

 8,211

9,379

 10,333

11,272

 

78,001 -

 80,000

 4,908

7,156

 8,351

9,539

 10,513

11,472

 

80,001 -

 82,000

 5,008

7,276

 8,491

9,699

 10,693

11,672

 

82,001 -

 84,000

 5,108

7,396

 8,631

9,859

 10,873

11,872

 

84,001 -

 86,000

 5,208

7,516

 8,771

10,019

 11,053

12,072

 

86,001 -

 88,000

 5,308

7,636

 8,911

10,179

 11,233

12,272

 

88,001 -

 90,000

 5,408

7,756

 9,051

10,339

 11,413

12,472

 

90,001 -

 92,000

 5,508

7,876

 9,191

10,499

 11,593

12,672

 

92,001 -

 94,000

 5,608

7,996

 9,331

10,659

 11,773

12,872

 

94,001 -

 96,000

 5,708

8,116

 9,471

10,819

 11,953

13,072

 

96,001 -

 98,000

 5,808

8,236

 9,611

10,979

 12,133

13,272

 

98,001 -

 100,000

 5,908

8,356

 9,751

11,139

 12,313

13,472





Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 37, 2008 General Session

